Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.250

Quorum and voting requirements.

(1) Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may approve a corporate action at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares exists with respect to that corporate action. Unless the articles of incorporation or this title provide otherwise, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the corporate action by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for approval of that corporate action. Whenever this title requires a particular quorum for a specified corporate action, the articles of incorporation may not provide for a lower quorum.

(2) Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting other than solely to object to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting, it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or must be set for that adjourned meeting.

(3) If a quorum exists, a corporate action, other than the election of directors, is approved by a voting group if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the corporate action exceed the votes cast within the voting group opposing the corporate action, unless the articles of incorporation or this title require a greater number of affirmative votes.

(4) An amendment of the articles of incorporation adding, changing, or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than specified in subsection (1) or (3) of this section is governed by RCW 23B.07.270.

(5) Whenever a provision of this title provides for voting of classes or series as separate voting groups, the rules provided in RCW 23B.10.040(3) for amendments of the articles of incorporation apply to that provision.

(6) The election of directors is governed by RCW 23B.07.280.

[ 2024 c 22 s 15; 2009 c 189 s 18; 1989 c 165 s 73.]